zh-CN: 适配水上运动板类型: 趴板; 水翼板; 风筝冲浪板; 长板; 短板; 沙板; 站立式桨板 (SUP); 冲浪板; 尾波板; 帆板; 其他
nl: Compatibel type watersportboard: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfplank; Wakeboard; Windsurfplank; Overige
vi: Loại ván thể thao dưới nước tương thích: Ván lướt sóng nằm (Bodyboard); Ván lướt sóng cánh ngầm (Foil board); Ván lướt ván diều (Kiteboard); Ván dài; Ván ngắn; Ván lướt sóng bờ (Skimboard); Ván chèo đứng (SUP); Ván lướt sóng; Ván lướt ván canô (Wakeboard); Ván lướt ván buồm; Khác
cs: Kompatibilní typ prkna pro vodní sporty: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Paddleboard (SUP); Surfové prkno; Wakeboard; Prkno na windsurfing; Jiné
zh-TW: 相容的水上運動板類型: 趴板; 水翼板; 風箏衝浪板; 長板; 短板; 沙板; 立式划槳 (SUP); 衝浪板; 滑水板; 風帆衝浪板; 其他
pt-PT: Tipo de prancha compatível para desportos aquáticos: Prancha de bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Prancha de kitesurf; Longboard; Shortboard; Prancha de skimboard; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Prancha de surf; Prancha de wakeboard; Prancha de windsurf; Outra
es: Tipo de tabla de deportes acuáticos compatible: Bodyboard; Tabla foil; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Tabla de surf de remo (SUP); Tabla de surf; Wakeboard; Tabla de windsurf; Otro
el: Συμβατός τύπος σανίδας θαλάσσιων σπορ: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Σανίδα όρθιας κωπηλασίας (SUP); Σανίδα του σερφ; Wakeboard; Σανίδα του γουίντσερφ; Άλλο
sl-SI: Združljiva vrsta deske za vodne športe: Bodyboard; Foil deska; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Deska za stoječe veslanje (SUP); Deska za surfanje; Wakeboard; Deska za jadranje na deski; Drugo
it: Tipo di tavola per sport acquatici compatibile: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Tavola da surf; Wakeboard; Tavola da windsurf; Altro
ko: 호환 수상 스포츠 보드 유형: 보디보드; 포일 보드; 카이트보드; 롱보드; 숏보드; 스킴보드; 스탠드업 패들보드(SUP); 서핑보드; 웨이크보드; 윈드서핑 보드; 기타
fr: Type de planche de sports nautiques compatible: Bodyboard; Planche de foil; Planche de kitesurf; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddle (SUP); Planche de surf; Wakeboard; Planche à voile; Autre
de: Kompatibler Wassersportboard-Typ: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-Up-Paddleboard (SUP); Surfbrett; Wakeboard; Windsurfbrett; Sonstige
da: Kompatibel type vandsportsbræt: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand up paddleboard (SUP); Surfbræt; Wakeboard; Windsurfbræt; Andet
th: ประเภทของบอร์ดกีฬาทางน้ำที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: บอดี้บอร์ด; ฟอยล์บอร์ด; ไคท์บอร์ด; ลองบอร์ด; ชอร์ตบอร์ด; สกิมบอร์ด; กระดานซับบอร์ด (SUP); กระดานโต้คลื่น; เวกบอร์ด; วินด์เซิร์ฟบอร์ด; อื่นๆ
ja: 互換性のあるウォータースポーツボードタイプ: ボディボード; フォイルボード; カイトボード; ロングボード; ショートボード; スキムボード; スタンドアップパドルボード (SUP); サーフボード; ウェイクボード; ウィンドサーフボード; その他
bg-BG: Съвместим тип дъска за водни спортове: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Кайтборд; Лонгборд; Шортборд; Скимборд; Стандъп падълборд (SUP); Сърфборд; Уейкборд; Уиндсърф дъска; Друг
lt-LT: Suderinamas vandens sporto lentos tipas: Bodibordas; Burlentė su povandeniniu sparnu; Jėgos aitvarų lenta; Ilgoji banglentė; Trumpoji banglentė; Skimbordas; Irklentė (SUP); Banglentė; Vandenlentė; Burlentė; Kita
en: Compatible water sport board type: Bodyboard; Foil board; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfboard; Wakeboard; Windsurf board; Other
fi: Yhteensopiva vesiurheilulautatyyppi: Bodyboard; Foil-lauta; Leijalauta; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; SUP-lauta; Surffilauta; Wakeboard; Purjelauta; Muu
pl: Kompatybilny typ deski do sportów wodnych: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Deska SUP (Stand-up paddleboard); Deska surfingowa; Wakeboard; Deska windsurfingowa; Inne
tr: Uyumlu su sporları tahtası türü: Bodyboard; Foil sörf tahtası; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Sörf tahtası; Wakeboard; Rüzgar sörfü tahtası; Diğer
sk-SK: Kompatibilný typ dosky na vodné športy: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Surfovacia doska; Wakeboard; Windsurfová doska; Iné
hu: Kompatibilis vízisport-deszka típusa: Bodyboard; Foil deszka; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Szörfdeszka; Wakeboard; Windsurf deszka; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kompatibilni tip daske za vodene sportove: Bodyboard; Foil daska; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Daska za uspravno veslanje (SUP); Daska za surfanje; Wakeboard; Daska za jedrenje na dasci; Ostalo
nb: Kompatibel type vannsportbrett: Bodyboard; Foilbrett; Kitebrett; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; SUP-brett (Stand-up paddleboard); Surfebrett; Wakeboard; Vindsurfebrett; Annet
ru: Совместимый тип доски для водных видов спорта: Бодиборд; Фойлборд; Кайтборд; Лонгборд; Шортборд; Скимборд; Сапборд (SUP); Доска для серфинга; Вейкборд; Доска для виндсерфинга; Другое
pt-BR: Tipo de prancha compatível para esportes aquáticos: Bodyboard; Prancha de foil; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Prancha de stand-up paddle (SUP); Prancha de surf; Wakeboard; Prancha de windsurf; Outro
sv: Kompatibla vattensportbrädor: Bodyboard; Foilboard; Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; SUP-bräda (Stand-up paddleboard); Surfbräda; Wakeboard; Vindsurfbräda; Övrigt
ro-RO: Tip de placă pentru sporturi nautice compatibilă: Bodyboard; Placă cu foil (foil board); Kiteboard; Longboard; Shortboard; Skimboard; Stand-up paddleboard (SUP); Placă de surf; Wakeboard; Placă de windsurf; Altele